Washington statutes.
RCW 23.78.060

Right to vote—Power to amend or repeal bylaws—Right to amend articles of incorporation.

(1) No capital stock other than membership shares shall be given voting power in an employee cooperative, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, or in the articles of incorporation.

(2) The power to amend or repeal bylaws of an employee cooperative shall be in the members only.

(3) Except as otherwise permitted by RCW 23B.10.040, no capital stock other than membership shares shall be permitted to vote on any amendment to the articles of incorporation.

[ 1991 c 72 s 12; 1987 c 457 s 7.]